Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 47

Passenger Railroad Commission [Repealed]

4-47-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 433, §§ 2-6; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 22, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 47, §§4-47-101 —4-47-105, concerned the passenger railroad commission.

4-47-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 433, §§ 2-6; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 22, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 47, §§4-47-101 —4-47-105, concerned the passenger railroad commission.

4-47-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 433, §§ 2-6; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 22, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 47, §§4-47-101 —4-47-105, concerned the passenger railroad commission.

4-47-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 433, §§ 2-6; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 22, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 47, §§4-47-101 —4-47-105, concerned the passenger railroad commission.

4-47-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1995, ch. 433, §§ 2-6; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 22, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 47, §§4-47-101 —4-47-105, concerned the passenger railroad commission.